Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 1 Militia

30-1-1.
Short title.

Chapters 1 — 14 of this title shall be cited and known as the “Military Code of Rhode Island”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, G.L. 1956, §

30-1-1

.

30-1-2.
Male members.

The militia of the state shall consist of all able-bodied male citizens of the state and all other able-bodied males who have, or shall have, declared their intention to become citizens of the United States, resident within the state, and who shall be more than eighteen (18) years of age and, except as hereinafter provided, not more than forty-five (45) years of age, and such other persons as may upon their own application be enlisted or commissioned therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-1-2

.

30-1-3.
Female members.

The governor may authorize the appointment or enlistment of female citizens of the state between the ages of eighteen (18) and forty-five (45) in the medical corps, nursing corps, and other noncombatant branches and services of the national guard or unorganized militia, and while so serving, they shall have the same status as male members of the non-combatant branches and services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 1; G.L. 1956, §

30-1-3

.

30-1-4.
Classes of militia.

The militia of the state shall be divided into four (4) classes:

The Rhode Island national guard, which shall be sub-divided into the Rhode Island army national guard and the Rhode Island air national guard;

The naval militia;

The independent chartered military organizations; and

The unorganized militia.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 2; G.L. 1956, §

30-1-4

; P.L. 1962, ch. 66, § 1.

30-1-5.
Composition of unorganized militia.

The unorganized militia shall consist of all persons liable to service in the militia who are not members of the national guard, naval militia, or independent chartered military organizations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 3; G.L. 1956, §

30-1-5

.

30-1-6.
Enrollment.

Whenever the governor deems it necessary, he or she may order an enrollment to be made of all persons liable to service in the militia. The enrollment shall be accomplished and exemptions from liability to perform militia duty shall be determined and established in accordance with rules and regulations to be prescribed by the governor, and the rules and regulations so prescribed shall have the force and effect of law. Any person required to perform any act under this section who neglects or refuses to properly perform that act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 4; G.L. 1956, §

30-1-6

.

30-1-7.
Persons exempt.

The following persons shall be exempt from militia duty:

Persons exempt from militia duty by the laws of the United States;

Persons who have held the office of governor or lieutenant-governor of the state; and

Persons of the following description, so long as they shall remain of the description:

The lieutenant-governor;

The secretary of state;

The attorney general and the assistant attorneys general;

The general treasurer;

Director of administration;

The budget officer and the controller both of the department of administration;

The commissioner of the department of education;

The members of both houses of the general assembly and the officers of those houses;

The justices and clerks of courts of record;

The recorder of deeds;

Deputy sheriffs;

The director of the department of human services;

The assistant director of social and rehabilitative services in charge of the community services division;

Mayors of cities;

Members of the city and town councils;

City and town clerks;

City and town treasurers;

Ministers of the gospel;

Practicing physicians;

Superintendents, officers and assistants employed in or about any of the state hospitals, state infirmaries, state reformatories, state prisons, jails or houses of correction;

Keepers of lighthouses;

Marine pilots;

Seamen actually employed on board of any vessel; and

Active members of fire companies who are part of the active fire department of the town or city in which they reside, not exceeding twenty (20) persons to any one company, unless otherwise provided by special enactment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 5; G.L. 1956, §

30-1-7

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 57.

30-1-8.
Conscientious objectors.

All persons who because of religious belief shall claim exemption from militia service, if the conscientious holding of that belief by the person shall be established under the regulations prescribed by the governor, shall be exempted from militia service in a combatant capacity, but no person so exempted shall be exempt from militia service in any capacity that the governor shall declare to be noncombatant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 5; G.L. 1956, §

30-1-8

.

30-1-9.
Federal laws and customs applicable.

All acts of the Congress of the United States, regulations issued thereunder, the Uniform Code of Military Justice (10 U.S.C. §§ 801 — 946), forms, precedents, customs, and usages relating to and governing the army of the United States and the militia shall, insofar as they are applicable and not inconsistent with the constitution of this state, apply to and govern the militia of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 6; G.L. 1956, §

30-1-9

.

30-1-10.
Conformity of state provisions to federal law.

The intent of chapters 1 — 14 of this title is to conform to all acts and regulations of the United States affecting the same subjects, and all provisions of these chapters shall be construed to effect this purpose.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 7; G.L. 1956, §

30-1-10

.

30-1-11.
Command exercised by national guard officer.

Whenever different parts of the militia are ordered out together for any services within the state, or otherwise are on duty together, the senior commissioned officer of the field or line of the national guard shall be in command of all those different parts of the militia.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3742, par. 8; G.L. 1956, §

30-1-11

.

30-1-12, 30-1-13.
Repealed.